Maryland, session 2025, HB0458.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
13–107.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “PROGRAM” OR “TERPSEXCEED PROGRAM” MEANS THE
UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK CAMPUS TERPSEXCEED
(EXPERIENCING COLLEGE THROUGH EDUCATION AND EMPLOYMENT DISCOVERY)
PROGRAM.
(3) “UNIVERSITY” MEANS THE UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND,
COLLEGE PARK CAMPUS.
(B) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
GOVERNOR MAY INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF
$350,000 FOR THE TERPSEXCEED PROGRAM AT THE UNIVERSITY.
– 1 –

Ch. 347 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(C) (1) THE FUNDING PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION MAY SERVE AS A SUSTAINABLE FUNDING SOURCE FOR THE MANAGEMENT
OF THE TERPSEXCEED PROGRAM TO PROVIDE EDUCATIONAL AND EMPLOYMENT
OPPORTUNITIES TO STUDENTS WITH INTELLECTUAL DISABILITIES AND TO ENABLE
THE PROGRAM’S FUTURE EXPANSION.
(2) THE FUNDING PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION MAY BE USED FOR:
(I) ADVISING AND COUNSELING STUDENTS IN THE PROGRAM
TO ASSIST WITH SCHEDULING AND REGISTRATION FOR CLASSES, OUTREACH TO
PROFESSORS, DESIGNING COURSE MODIFICATIONS, PROVIDING IN–CLASS SUPPORT
AND ACCOMMODATIONS, AND OFFERING MENTOR TUTORING;
(II) ADVISING AND COUNSELING STUDENTS IN THE PROGRAM
TO ASSIST WITH CALENDAR MANAGEMENT;
(III) ADVISING AND COUNSELING STUDENTS IN THE PROGRAM
TO FACILITATE STUDENT CLUB AND ACTIVITY CHOICES;
(IV) TRAINING AND COMMUNICATING WITH RESIDENT
ASSISTANTS AND RESIDENT DIRECTORS IN THE PROGRAM;
(V) OFFERING COURSES IN PEER MENTORSHIP IN THE
PROGRAM;
(VI) ADVISING PEER MENTORS IN THE PROGRAM;
(VII) OFFERING COURSES IN CAREER DEVELOPMENT IN THE
PROGRAM;
(VIII) DEVELOPING INTERNSHIP AND JOB OPPORTUNITIES ON
AND OFF CAMPUS, GATHERING SUPERVISOR FEEDBACK, AND PROVIDING DIRECT
EMPLOYMENT SUPPORT, INCLUDING GOAL SETTING AND CAREER PLANNING FOR
EACH STUDENT IN THE PROGRAM;
(IX) CONNECTING STUDENTS IN THE PROGRAM WITH STATE
AGENCIES THAT SUPPORT INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES;
(X) MANAGING THE USE OF SELF–DIRECTED WAIVER BUDGETS
FOR ON–CAMPUS SUPPORTS IN THE PROGRAM;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 347
(XI) MANAGING FINANCIAL AID SYSTEMS FOR THE PROGRAM;
(XII) SHARING RESOURCES NEEDED FOR POST–PROGRAM
SUPPORT; AND
(XIII) FACILITATING A CROSS–AGENCY, INTEGRATED RESOURCE
TEAM FOR EACH STUDENT IN THE PROGRAM AND ANY OTHER CUSTOMIZED
PROGRAMMING OR DIRECT COUNSELING THAT SUPPORTS THE WELL–BEING OF
EACH STUDENT IN THE PROGRAM AND FOSTERS SPECIFIC OPPORTUNITIES FOR
SELF–DETERMINATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 3 –